hr-HR: Vrsta skretnice visokotonca: Linijski kondenzator (1. reda / visokopropusni filtar 6 dB/okt); Linijski skretnički modul (nepodesiv); Skretnica/zaštita nije uključena; Pasivna skretnica (vanjska/zasebna); Podesiva skretnica ili zaštita; Ostalo
es: Tipo de cruzado del tweeter: Capacitor en línea (1.er orden / paso alto de 6 dB/oct); Módulo de cruce en línea (no ajustable); No incluye protección/cruce; Red de cruce pasiva (externa/separada); Protección o cruce seleccionable/ajustable; Otro
hu: Magassugárzó keresztváltó típusa: Soros kondenzátor (1. rendű / 6 dB/oktáv felüláteresztő); Beépített hangváltó modul (nem állítható); Nincs hangváltó/védelem mellékelve; Passzív hangváltó hálózat (külső/különálló); Választható/állítható hangváltó vagy védelem; Egyéb
fi: Diskanttikaiuttimen jakosuotimen tyyppi: Linjakondensaattori (1. asteen / 6 dB/okt. ylipäästö); Linjajakosuodinmoduuli (ei säädettävä); Ei jakosuodinta/suojausta; Passiivinen jakosuodin (ulkoinen/erillinen); Valittava/säädettävä jakosuodin tai suojaus; Muu
sk-SK: Typ výhybky výškového reproduktora: In-line kondenzátor (1. rád / horná priepusť 6 dB/okt); In-line modul výhybky (nenastaviteľný); Bez zahrnutej výhybky/ochrany; Pasívna výhybka (externá/samostatná); Voliteľná/nastaviteľná výhybka alebo ochrana; Iný
de: Art der Hochtöner-Frequenzweiche: Inline-Kondensator (1. Ordnung / 6 dB/Okt. Hochpass); Inline-Frequenzweichenmodul (nicht einstellbar); Keine Frequenzweiche/Schutzschaltung enthalten; Passive Frequenzweiche (extern/separat); Wählbare/einstellbare Frequenzweiche oder Schutzschaltung; Sonstiges
pl: Typ zwrotnicy tweetera: Kondensator szeregowy (górnoprzepustowy 1. rzędu / 6 dB/okt.); Szeregowy moduł zwrotnicy (nieregulowany); Brak zwrotnicy/zabezpieczenia w zestawie; Pasywna sieć zwrotnicy (zewnętrzna/oddzielna); Wybierana/regulowana zwrotnica lub zabezpieczenie; Inne
ja: ツイータークロスオーバータイプ: インラインキャパシタ (1次 / 6 dB/oct ハイパス); インラインクロスオーバーモジュール (調整不可); クロスオーバー / 保護なし; パッシブクロスオーバーネットワーク (外部 / 分離型); 選択可能 / 調整可能なクロスオーバーまたは保護; その他
zh-TW: 高音揚聲器分音器類型: 串聯電容 (一階 / 6 dB/oct 高通); 串聯分音器模組 (不可調); 不含分音器/保護電路; 被動分音網路 (外部/獨立); 可選/可調式分音器或保護電路; 其他
fr: Type de filtre du haut-parleur d’aigus: Condensateur en ligne (1er ordre / passe-haut 6 dB/oct); Module de filtre en ligne (non réglable); Aucun filtre/protection inclus; Réseau de filtres passifs (externe/séparé); Filtre ou protection sélectionnable/réglable; Autre
ru: Тип кроссовера твитера: Линейный конденсатор (1-й порядок / фильтр ВЧ 6 дБ/окт); Линейный модуль кроссовера (нерегулируемый); Кроссовер/защита не входят в комплект; Пассивный кроссовер (внешний/отдельный); Переключаемый/регулируемый кроссовер или защита; Другое
bg-BG: Тип разделителен филтър за високочестотен говорител: Вграден кондензатор (1-ви ред / 6 dB/oct високочестотен филтър); Вграден кросоувър модул (без възможност за регулиране); Без кросоувър/защита; Пасивна кросоувър мрежа (външна/отделна); Избираем/регулируем кросоувър или защита; Друг
sv: Diskantfiltertyp: In-line-kondensator (1:a ordningen / 6 dB/okt högpass); In-line-delningsfilter (ej justerbart); Inget delningsfilter/skydd ingår; Passivt delningsfilter (externt/separat); Valbart/justerbart delningsfilter eller skydd; Annat
sl-SI: Vrsta kretnice za visokotonski zvočnik: Zaporedni kondenzator (1. red / 6 dB/okt visokoprepustni); Zaporedni kretniški modul (nenastavljiv); Brez vključene kretnice/zaščite; Pasivno kretniško vezje (zunanje/ločeno); Izbirna/nastavljiva kretnica ali zaščita; Drugo
en: Tweeter crossover type: Inline capacitor (1st-order / 6 dB/oct high-pass); Inline crossover module (non-adjustable); No crossover/protection included; Passive crossover network (external/separate); Selectable/adjustable crossover or protection; Other
tr: Tweeter geçiş filtresi tipi: Hat içi kapasitör (1. derece / 6 dB/oct yüksek geçiren); Hat içi crossover modülü (ayarlanamaz); Crossover/koruma dahil değil; Pasif crossover ağı (harici/ayrı); Seçilebilir/ayarlanabilir crossover veya koruma; Diğer
nl: Tweeter crossover type: Inline condensator (1e orde / 6 dB/oct high-pass); Inline crossover-module (niet-verstelbaar); Geen crossover/bescherming inbegrepen; Passief crossover-netwerk (extern/gescheiden); Selecteerbare/verstelbare crossover of bescherming; Anders
da: Crossovertype for tweeter: Inline-kondensator (1. orden / 6 dB/okt højpas); Inline-delefiltermodul (ikke justerbart); Delefilter/beskyttelse medfølger ikke; Passivt delefilternetværk (eksternt/separat); Valgbart/justerbart delefilter eller beskyttelse; Andet
nb: Type delefilter for diskant: Inline-kondensator (1. orden / 6 dB/okt høypass); Inline-delefiltermodul (ikke justerbar); Ingen delefilter/beskyttelse inkludert; Passivt delefilter-nettverk (ekstern/separat); Valgbar/justerbar delefilter eller beskyttelse; Annet
cs: Typ výhybky výškového reproduktoru: Integrovaný kondenzátor (1. řádu / horní propust 6 dB/okt.); Integrovaný modul výhybky (nenastavitelný); Bez výhybky/ochrany; Pasivní výhybka (externí/samostatná); Volitelná/nastavitelná výhybka nebo ochrana; Ostatní
it: Tipo di filtro del tweeter: Condensatore in linea (1° ordine / passa-alto 6 dB/oct); Modulo crossover in linea (non regolabile); Nessun crossover/protezione inclusi; Rete crossover passiva (esterna/separata); Crossover o protezione selezionabili/regolabili; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de filtru crossover pentru tweeter: Condensator în linie (ordinul 1 / 6 dB/oct trece-sus); Modul crossover în linie (neajustabil); Niciun crossover/protecție inclusă; Rețea crossover pasivă (externă/separată); Crossover sau protecție selectabilă/ajustabilă; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de crossover do tweeter: Condensador em linha (passa-alto de 1.ª ordem/6 dB/oct); Módulo de crossover em linha (não ajustável); Sem crossover/proteção incluída; Rede de crossover passiva (externa/separada); Proteção ou crossover selecionável/ajustável; Outro
pt-BR: Tweeter tipo de crossover: Capacitor em linha (1ª ordem / passa-alta de 6 dB/oitava); Módulo de crossover em linha (não ajustável); Sem crossover/proteção incluída; Rede de crossover passivo (externo/separado); Crossover ou proteção selecionável/ajustável; Outro
lt-LT: Aukštųjų dažnių garsiakalbio kryžminio skirstytuvo tipas: Linijinis kondensatorius (1-os eilės / 6 dB/okt. aukšto dažnio); Linijinis krosoverio modulis (nereguliuojamas); Be krosoverio / apsaugos; Pasyvusis krosoveris (išorinis / atskiras); Pasirenkamas / reguliuojamas krosoveris arba apsauga; Kita
ko: 트위터 크로스오버 유형: 인라인 커패시터(1차 / 6dB/oct 하이패스); 인라인 크로스오버 모듈(조절 불가); 크로스오버/보호 포함 안 됨; 패시브 크로스오버 네트워크(외장형/분리형); 선택형/조절형 크로스오버 또는 보호; 기타
el: Τύπος crossover tweeter: Πυκνωτής σε σειρά (1ης τάξης / 6 dB/oct υψιπερατό); Μονάδα crossover σε σειρά (μη ρυθμιζόμενη); Δεν περιλαμβάνεται crossover/προστασία; Παθητικό δίκτυο crossover (εξωτερικό/ξεχωριστό); Επιλέξιμο/ρυθμιζόμενο crossover ή προστασία; Άλλο
vi: Loại phân tần loa tweeter: Tụ điện nối tiếp (bậc 1 / thông cao 6 dB/oct); Mô-đun phân tần nối tiếp (không thể điều chỉnh); Không bao gồm phân tần/bảo vệ; Mạch phân tần thụ động (bên ngoài/tách biệt); Phân tần hoặc bảo vệ có thể chọn/điều chỉnh; Khác
th: ทวีตเตอร์ครอสโอเวอร์ชนิด: ตัวเก็บประจุแบบอินไลน์ (1st-order / 6 dB/oct ไฮพาส); โมดูลครอสโอเวอร์แบบอินไลน์ (ปรับไม่ได้); ไม่มีครอสโอเวอร์/ระบบป้องกัน; เน็ตเวิร์คครอสโอเวอร์แบบพาสซีฟ (ภายนอก/แยกส่วน); ครอสโอเวอร์หรือระบบป้องกันแบบเลือกปรับได้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 高音单元分频器类型: 串联电容（一阶 / 6 dB/oct 高通）; 串联分频器模块（不可调）; 不含分频器/保护装置; 无源分频网络（外部/独立）; 可选/可调分频器或保护装置; 其他